California, session 20252026, AB266.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2562.5 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:2562.5. (a) Each tow truck participating in a freeway service patrol shall bear a logo comprised of, at a minimum, a circle, a triangle, and a tow truck silhouette, with the words “Freeway Service Patrol,” which identifies the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the department, and, at the option of the entity, the participating regional or local entity. Participating regional or local entities may place an approved logo on participating tow trucks.(b) (1) (A) The department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and participating and eligible regional and local entities shall, each time the guidelines for program operations developed pursuant to Section 2565 are updated after January 1, 2026, consider developing or revising and including in the guidelines operational requirements for sponsorship agreements between a participating regional or local entity and any private third party that allow for the display of the sponsor’s name and logo on participating tow trucks.(B) The operational requirements developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include a requirement that the name and logo of the sponsor shall not overlap with or reduce the visibility of the identifying logo required pursuant to subdivision (a).(b)(2) A participating regional or local entity may may, following the update to the guidelines described in paragraph (1), generate additional revenue for its freeway service patrol by entering into						exclusive a sponsorship agreements that allow for the display of a sponsor’s name and logo on participating tow trucks. This additional logo shall not overlap with or reduce the visibility of the identifying logo required pursuant to subdivision (a). agreement subject to the operational requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (1).